Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201621-2,218
Procedure for and effect of revocation.

(MBCA 15.31) (a) If the Secretary
of State determines that one or more grounds exist under section 21-2,217
for revocation of a certificate of authority, the Secretary of State shall
serve the foreign corporation with written notice of such determination under
section 21-2,212.

(b) If the foreign corporation
does not correct each ground for revocation or demonstrate to the reasonable
satisfaction of the Secretary of State that each ground determined by the
Secretary of State does not exist within sixty days after service of the notice
is perfected under section 21-2,212, the Secretary of State shall administratively
revoke the foreign corporation's certificate of authority by signing a certificate
of revocation that recites the ground or grounds for revocation and its effective
date. The Secretary of State shall file the original of the certificate and
serve a copy on the foreign corporation under section 21-2,212.

(c) The authority of a foreign
corporation to transact business in this state ceases on the date shown on
the certificate revoking its certificate of authority.

(d) Revocation of a foreign
corporation's certificate of authority does not terminate the authority of
the registered agent of the corporation.

Laws 2014, LB749, § 218.